Hawaii, session 2026, GM1358.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that widespread
underinsurance slows community disaster recovery and increases
the cost of aid provided by nonprofit and governmental entities.
The legislature further finds that the 2023 Maui wildfires
revealed that many homeowners were severely underinsured,
leaving many affected residents unable to rebuild and forcing
them into debt or permanent displacement.
The legislature recognizes that the State faces rapidly
escalating rebuilding costs due to its geographic isolation and
reliance on imported materials, high labor costs, limited
workforce availability, and lengthy permitting and rebuilding
timelines. These factors cause replacement costs to rise
quickly, often outpacing policy limits if coverage is not
reviewed regularly.
The legislature notes that most homeowners do not receive
annual updates about whether their coverage matches the current
cost of rebuilding. Homeowners often discover that they are
2026-2470 SB2964 GDI SMA.docx
linilllllHIIIIIHiUllllUIM

Page 2 S.B. NO. sTi
C.D. 1
underinsured only after a catastrophic loss. This lack of
transparency leaves policyholders vulnerable and less likely to
fully recover following a disaster.
The legislature finds that further efforts are necessary to
provide homeowners with opportunities to ensure they have
adequate coverage to fully replace the residence after a loss.
Without these opportunities, homeowners may unknowingly remain
underinsured, post-disaster rebuilding delays may increase, and
nonprofit and government disaster relief efforts may face higher
costs and longer timelines.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to:
(1) Require homeowners insurance producers to notify
policyholders that they may submit information
regarding improvements made to the insured residential
property, which shall then be submitted to the
homeowners insurer;
(2) Require homeowners insurers to reevaluate the
replacement cost estimate based on the information
submitted by a policyholder, and offer the
policyholder the option to purchase additional
2026-2470 SB2964 CDl SMA.docx
liiiiiinniiiiiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 3 S.B. NO. S?,
C.D. 1
coverage to cover the full amount of the replacement
cost estimate; and
(3) Establish administrative penalties for violations.
SECTION 2. Chapter 431, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new part to article lOE to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
"PART REPLACEMENT COST DISCLOSURE AND INSURANCE TO VALUE
§431:10E-A Definitions. As used in this part:
"Dwelling coverage limit" means the maximum amount the
homeowners insurer will pay to repair, rebuild, or replace the
home's physical structure and attached items after a covered
loss.
"Homeowners insurance" has the same meaning as defined in
section 431:14-110.8.
"Homeowners insurer" has the same meaning as defined in
section 431:14-110.8.
"Policyholder" means the person named as the insured under
the homeowners insurance.
"Replacement cost" means the amount necessary to repair,
rebuild, or replace damaged property with materials of like kind
and quality, without deduction for depreciation.
2026-2470 SB2964 CDl SMA.docx

Page 4 S.B. NO. 25*1
C.D. 1
§431:10E-B Biennial notice requirement. (a) At least
once every two years, each insurance producer of homeowners
insurance shall provide the policyholder with a written notice
informing the policyholder that the policyholder may submit
information regarding improvements made to the insured
residential property, including the type of improvement and the
costs of that improvement, for purposes of preparing an updated
replacement cost estimate,
(b) The notice shall be delivered in paper format;
provided that the insurance producer may allow responses to be
submitted electronically.
§431:10E-C Offer to insure to replacement cost. (a)
Information regarding improvements made to the insured
residential property received by an insurance producer pursuant
to a notice under section 431:10E-B shall be submitted to the
homeowners insurer.
(b) The homeowners insurer shall use the information to
reevaluate the replacement cost for the insured residential
property. If the dwelling coverage limit is less than the
replacement cost, the homeowners insurer shall offer the
policyholder the option to purchase additional coverage under
2026-2470 SB2964 CDl SMA.docx
lllllillMIBIIIIIIHIIIHIWilllll

Page 5
S.B. NO.
-1
C.D. 1
the homeowners insurance to increase the dwelling coverage limit
to equal the replacement cost.
(c) The offer shall:
(1) Include the premium for the increased coverage;
(2) Remain open for thirty days; and
(3) Be renewed annually.
§431:10E-D Administrative penalty. A person that commits
a violation under this part shall be subject to a fine of $250
for each violation."
SECTION 3. In codifying the new sections added by
section 2 of this Act, the revisor of statutes shall substitute
appropriate section numbers for the letters used in designating
the new sections in this Act.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
2026-2470 SB2964 CDl SMA.docx

2964
S.B. NO
I
w
b
o
o b
APPROVED this 14th day of July ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1

S.B. No. 2964, S.D. 1, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date; May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
75-26

SB No. 2964, SD 1, HD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives